District of Columbia statutes.
29A-404

Repealed

Construction.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1971, 85 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 92-180, § 4
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(n), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1104.
1981 Ed., § 29-604.
2001 Ed., § 29-404.